Washington statutes.
RCW 25.15.466

Definitions.

In this article:

(1) "Dissenter" means a member who is entitled to dissent from a plan of merger and who exercises that right when and in the manner required by this article.

(2) "Fair value," with respect to a dissenter's limited liability company interest, means the value of the member's limited liability company interest immediately before the effectuation of the merger to which the dissenter objects, excluding any appreciation or depreciation in anticipation of the merger unless exclusion would be inequitable.

(3) "Interest" means interest from the effective date of the merger until the date of payment, at the average rate currently paid by the limited liability company on its principal bank loans or, if none, at a rate that is fair and equitable under all the circumstances.

(4) "Limited liability company" means the limited liability company in which the dissenter holds or held a membership interest, or the surviving organization by merger, whether foreign or domestic, of that limited liability company.

[ 2015 c 188 s 89.]